Utah statutes.
10-7-8.   Resolution on bond issue -- Election as provided by Local Government Bonding Act.

When the board of commissioners, city council or the town board of trustees of any city or town shall have decided that incurring such bonded indebtedness is advisable, it shall by resolution specify the purpose for which the indebtedness is to be created and the amount of bonds which it is proposed to issue, and shall provide for submitting the question of the issue of such bonds to the qualified electors of the city or town at the next general election, or at a special election to be called for that purpose by the board of commissioners, city council or board of trustees in such manner and subject to such conditions as is provided in Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act.  This section does not require an election for the issuance of refunding bonds or other bonds not required by the Constitution to be voted at an election.



Amended by Chapter 105, 2005 General Session

